New York, session 2025-2026, A177.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 2401 of the surrogate's court 2 procedure act is amended to read as follows: 3 4. Unless specifically indicated [no] a fee in an amount equal to 4 forty-five dollars is chargeable for all motions made in a pending 5 proceeding [or] and for ex parte applications. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01171-01-5